Utah statutes.
53A-11-902.   Conduct and discipline policies and procedures.

The conduct and discipline policies required under Section 53A-11-901 shall include:

(1)  provisions governing student conduct, safety, and welfare;

(2)  standards and procedures for dealing with students who cause disruption in the classroom, on school grounds, on school vehicles, or in connection with school-related activities or events;

(3)  procedures for the development of remedial discipline plans for students who cause a disruption at any of the places referred to in Subsection (2);

(4)  procedures for the use of reasonable and necessary physical restraint or force in dealing with disruptive students, consistent with Section 53A-11-802;

(5)  standards and procedures for dealing with student conduct in locations other than those referred to in Subsection (2), if the conduct threatens harm or does harm to:

(a)  the school;

(b)  school property;

(c)  a person associated with the school; or

(d)  property associated with a person described in Subsection (5)(c);

(6)  procedures for the imposition of disciplinary sanctions, including suspension and expulsion;

(7)  specific provisions, consistent with Section 53A-15-603, for preventing and responding to gang-related activities in the school, on school grounds, on school vehicles, or in connection with school-related activities or events; and

(8)  standards and procedures for dealing with habitual disruptive student behavior in accordance with the provisions of this part.

